District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-201.29

Increase or diminution of stock — Extension of business.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1288, ch. 854, § 633
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(1), 58 DCR 1720

History

2001 Ed., § 29-201.29.
1981 Ed., § 29-229.
1973 Ed., § 29-229.

Prior Codifications